Mississippi, session 2026, HB4129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Christopher Preston of Covington County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector on November 21, 1995, in Forrest County for the crimes of Burglary and Forgery, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years for burglary in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, and also sentenced to serve three (3) years for Forgery, with such sentence to run concurrent with the five (5) year burglary sentence. He was released on Earned Release Supervision on May 1, 2000, and discharged on October 10, 2000.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.